District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-505

Board of Veterinary Examiners; duties of Mayor.

Repealed.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 6, 29 DCR 5297
Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-107, § 2, 51 DCR 1338
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 87, 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 20-96 provided that rules promulgated pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title shall remain in effect until the Mayor promulgates rules to implement this subchapter.